Idaho, session 2025, H0249.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Constitutional Officers
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs
and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. ATTORNEY GENERAL:
A. STATE LEGAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $27,174,900 $1,282,900 $28,457,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 360,800 28,300 389,100
Consumer Protection
Fund 343,600 153,000 496,600
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 269,700 2,400 272,100


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 994,100 209,300 1,203,400
TOTAL $29,143,100 $1,675,900 $30,819,000
B. INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,755,800 $327,400 $1,017,300 $3,100,500
Federal Grant
Fund 158,900 218,800 6,000 383,700
TOTAL $1,914,700 $546,200 $1,023,300 $3,484,200
C. SPECIAL LITIGATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $740,700 $740,700
DIVISION TOTAL $31,057,800 $2,962,800 $1,023,300 $35,043,900
II. STATE CONTROLLER:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,283,900 $1,960,100 $3,244,000
Federal COVID-19 Relief
Fund 0 1,659,200 1,659,200
TOTAL $1,283,900 $3,619,300 $4,903,200
B. STATEWIDE ACCOUNTING:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,256,700 $459,300 $1,716,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 5,000 5,000
TOTAL $1,256,700 $464,300 $1,721,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. COMPUTER CENTER:
FROM:
Data Processing Services
Fund $6,383,000 $2,858,700 $9,241,700
D. ENTERPRISE BUSINESS OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,174,500 $6,138,600 $9,313,100
Business Information Infrastructure
Fund 43,900 43,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 5,000 5,000
TOTAL $3,218,400 $6,143,600 $9,362,000
DIVISION TOTAL $12,142,000 $13,085,900 $25,227,900
III. EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR:
A. ADMINISTRATION - GOVERNOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,427,700 $308,600 $2,736,300
B. ACTING GOVERNOR PAY:
FROM:
General
Fund $17,800 $17,800
C. EXPENSE ALLOWANCE:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,900 $4,900
D. GOVERNORS EMERGENCY:
FROM:


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Governor's Emergency
Fund $2,000,000 $2,000,000
DIVISION TOTAL $2,445,500 $2,313,500 $4,759,000
IV. LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR:
FROM:
General
Fund $280,300 $33,100 $313,400
V. SECRETARY OF STATE:
A. SECRETARY OF STATE:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,621,400 $1,565,100 $5,186,500
B. COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS:
FROM:
General
Fund $56,200 $56,200
DIVISION TOTAL $3,621,400 $1,621,300 $5,242,700
VI. STATE TREASURER:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,184,900 $519,300 $1,704,200
State Treasurer LGIP
Fund 221,100 138,300 359,400
Treasurer's Office - Professional Services
Fund 996,600 606,200 1,602,800
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 80,000 80,000
Abandoned Property Trust - Unclaimed Property
Fund 1,197,300 496,000 1,693,300
TOTAL $3,599,900 $1,839,800 $5,439,700


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
DIVISION TOTAL $3,599,900 $1,839,800 $5,439,700
GRAND TOTAL $53,146,900 $21,856,400 $1,023,300 $76,026,600
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs for the Constitutional Officers listed be-
low is authorized no more than the following number of full-time equivalent
positions at any point during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026,
unless specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appro-
priations Committee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so
authorized.
Executive Office of the Governor ...............................21.00
Office of the Lieutenant Governor ...............................3.00
Office of the Attorney General ................................227.40
Office of the State Controller ................................115.00
Office of the Secretary of State ...............................35.50
Office of the State Treasurer ..................................30.00
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS. The Executive Office of the Governor is hereby exempted from the pro-
visions of Section 67-3511 (1), (2), and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited
transfers between expense classes and between programs, for all moneys ap-
propriated to it for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legisla-
tive appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund
unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS. The Office of the Attorney General is hereby exempted from the provi-
sions of Section 67-3511 (1), (2), and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited
transfers between expense classes and between programs, for all moneys ap-
propriated to it for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legisla-
tive appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund
unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The
Office of the Lieutenant Governor is hereby exempted from the provisions
of Section 67-3511 (1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers
between expense classes, for all moneys appropriated to it for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations shall not be
transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.


SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE DATA PROCESSING SERVICES
FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Office of the State Controller
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the Office of the State Controller from the Data Processing Services Fund for
fiscal year 2025 in an amount not to exceed $2,500,000 to be used for non-
recurring expenditures related to the Computer Service Center for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller
shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and pro-
gram, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappro-
priation authorized herein.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE GENERAL FUND. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Office of the State Controller any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Office
of the State Controller from the General Fund for the behavioral health
reporting data system for fiscal year 2025, to be used for nonrecurring ex-
penditures related to the behavioral health reporting data system for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. PAYMENT OF BANK SERVICE FEES. Of the amount appropriated to
the State Treasurer in Section 1 of this act, no more than $406,600 from the
General Fund and $221,700 from the Professional Services Fund may be used for
the payment of bank service fees for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 9. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.